Utah statutes.
17-53-103.   Unauthorized payment or warrant -- Investigation by another county attorney -- Action to enjoin or recover payment.

(1) (a)  If a county officer, without authority of law, orders any money paid for any purpose, or if any other county officer draws a warrant in the officer's own favor or in favor of any other person without being authorized to do so by the county legislative body or by law, the county attorney of that county shall request a county attorney from another county to investigate whether an unauthorized payment has been ordered or an unauthorized warrant drawn.

(b)  If the county attorney requests a county attorney from another county to investigate under Subsection (1)(a), the county attorney shall deputize the investigating county attorney.

(2)  If an investigating county attorney determines that an unauthorized payment has been ordered or that an unauthorized warrant has been drawn, that county attorney may commence and prosecute an action in the name of the county:

(a)  if the payment has not been made or the warrant paid, to enjoin the payment of the unauthorized payment or of the unauthorized warrant; or

(b)  if the payment has been made or the warrant paid, to recover from the payee or the county officer and the officer's official bondsman the amount paid.

(3)  An order of the county legislative body is not necessary in order to maintain an action under Subsection (2).

